District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.52

Amendment of articles of incorporation — Contents restricted; purposes.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 200, ch. 269, § 52
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 9
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.52.
1981 Ed., § 29-352.
1973 Ed., § 29-921f.